Mississippi, session 2026, SB2977.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to Claiborne County for the purpose of defraying costs associated with radiological emergency preparedness for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.. $ 1,200,000.00. SECTION 2.  It is the intent of the Legislature that the general funds appropriated under this act be derived from existing state nuclear-related revenue to sustain radiological emergency preparedness and the protection of first responders. SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.